Oklahoma, session 2026, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.414 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to thirty percent (30%) of the amount


of payments made by an employer against the student loan debt of an


employee.


B. The credit authorized pursuant to this section shall not be


used to reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than

Req. No. 1125 Page 1


zero (0). If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to


subsection A of this section exceeds the income tax liability, the


amount of credit not used in any tax year may be carried forward, in


order, to each of the ten (10) subsequent tax years.


C. The credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be


claimed on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission along


with any documentation that the Commission may require.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1125 QD 12/23/2024 10:26:57 AM





























Req. No. 1125 Page 2